Utah statutes.
76-10-703.   Fraudulent documents relating to organization or increase of capital stock.

Every officer, agent, or clerk of any corporation, or any person proposing to organize a corporation, or to increase the capital stock of any corporation, who knowingly exhibits any false, forged, or altered book, paper, voucher, security, or other instrument of evidence to any public officer or board authorized by law to examine the organization of the corporation, or to investigate its affairs, or to allow an increase of its capital, with intent to deceive the officer or board in respect thereto, shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree.

